Hawaii statutes.
§460J-16 Hearings. In all proceedings
before it, the board and each member thereof shall have the same powers
respecting administering oaths, compelling the attendance of witnesses and the
production of documentary evidence, and examining witnesses as are possessed by
circuit judges at chambers. In case of disobedience by any person of any order
of the board or of any member thereof, or of any subpoena issued by it or a
member, or the refusal of any witness to testify to any matter regarding which
the witness may be questioned lawfully, any circuit judge, on application by
the board or a member thereof, shall compel obedience as in the case of
disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued by a circuit court, or a
refusal to testify therein. [L 1972, c 134, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c
143, §4; am L 1992, c 87, §10 and c 202, §134]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next